Utah statutes.
48-3a-1110.   Restriction on transfer by member.

(1)  Except as provided in Subsections (2) and (3), a member of a professional services company may sell or transfer the member's interest in the professional services company only to:

(a)  the professional services company; or

(b)  an individual who is licensed or registered by this state to provide the same type of professional service as the professional service for which the professional services company is organized, or who otherwise satisfies the requirements of Subsection 48-3a-1109(1) or (2).

(2)  Upon the death or incapacity of a member of a professional services company, the member's interest in the professional services company may be transferred to the personal representative or estate of the deceased or incapacitated member.

(3)  The person to whom an interest is transferred under Subsection (2) may continue to hold the interest for a reasonable period, but may not participate in a decision concerning the providing of a professional service.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

